South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4628.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 44-34-50(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) A tattoo artist must be at least twenty-one eighteen years old and must possess a certificate of successful completion, on an annual basis, of a course in blood borne pathology and tattoo infection control as approved by the department, a current American Red Cross First Aid Certification and Adult Cardiopulmonary Resuscitation (CPR) Certification obtained either from the American Red Cross or the American Heart Association. A tattoo artist must conspicuously display in a public area on the premises of the tattoo facility the certificates of successful completion of a course in CPR, first aid, blood borne pathogens, and tattoo infection control. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----